en: E327, calcium lactate
xx: E327
ar: E327, لاكتات الكالسيوم
bg: E327, Калциев лактат
ca: E327, Lactat de calci
cs: E327, mléčnan vápenatý
da: E327, kalciumlaktat, calciumlactat
de: E327, Calciumlactat
el: E327, Γαλακτικο ασβεστιο
es: E327, lactato de calcio, lactato cálcico
et: E327, Kaltsiumlaktaat
fa: E327, کلسیم لاکتات
fi: E327, kalsiumlaktaatti, kalsiumlaktaattia
fr: E327, lactate de calcium
hr: E327, kalcijev laktat
hu: E327, Kalcium-laktát
it: E327, lattato di calcio
ja: E327, 乳酸カルシウム, 乳酸Ca, 乳酸Ｃａ
lt: E327, kalcio laktatas
lv: E327, kalcija laktāts
mt: E327, Lattat tal-kalċju
nl: E327, calciumlactaat
pl: E327, mleczan wapnia
pt: E327, lactato de cálcio
ro: E327, Lactat de calciu
ru: E327, лактат кальция
sh: E327, Kalcijum laktat
sk: E327, mliečnan vápenatý
sl: E327, Kalcijev laktat
sr: E327, Kalcijum laktat
sv: E327, kalciumlaktat
ta: E327, கால்சியம் லாக்டேட்டு
zh: E327, 乳酸钙

en: E328, ammonium lactate
xx: E328
bg: E328, Лактат на амония
cs: E328, Amoniový laktát
da: E328, Ammoniumlaktat
de: E328, Ammoniumlactat
el: E328, Λακτικό αμμωνίου
es: E328, Lactato de amonio
et: E328, Ammooniumlaktaat
fi: E328, Ammoniumlaktaatti, ammoniumlaktaattia
fr: E328, Lactate d'ammonium
hu: E328, Ammónium-laktát
it: E328, Ammonio lattato, Lattato di ammonio
lt: E328, Amonio laktatas
lv: E328, Amonija laktāts
mt: E328, Lattat tal-ammonju
nl: E328, Ammoniumlactaat
pl: E328, Mleczan amonu
pt: E328, Lactato de amônio, Lactato de amónio
ro: E328, Lactat de amoniu
sk: E328, Amoniový laktát
sl: E328, Amonijev laktat
sv: E328, Ammoniumlaktat

en: E329, Magnesium lactate
xx: E329
bg: E329, Лактат на магнезий
cs: E329, Laktát hořečnatý
da: E329, Magnesiumlaktat
de: E329, Magnesiumlactat
el: E329, Λακτικό μαγνήσιο
es: E329, Lactato de magnesio
et: E329, Magneesiumlaktaat
fi: E329, Magnesiumlaktaatti, Magnesiumlaktaattia
fr: E329, Lactate de magnésium
hu: E329, Magnézium-laktát
it: E329, Lattato di magnesio
lt: E329, Magnio laktatas
lv: E329, Magnija laktāts
mt: E329, Lattat tal-maġnezju
nl: E329, Magnesiumlactaat
pl: E329, Mleczan magnezu
pt: E329, Lactato de magnésio
ro: E329, Lactat de magneziu
sk: E329, Mliečnan horečnatý
sl: E329, Magnezijev laktat
sv: E329, Magnesiumlaktat

en: E330, Citric acid
xx: E330
af: Sitroensuur
ar: E330, حمض الليمون
az: E330, Limon turşusu
be: E330, Лімонная кіслата
bg: E330, Лимонена киселина, Лимонова киселина
bn: E330, সাইট্রিক অ্যাসিড
ca: E330, acid citric, àcid citric, àcid cítric
cs: E330, Kyselina citronová, kyselina citrónová, Citrát
cy: E330, Asid sitrig
da: E330, Citronsyre, Citrat
de: E330, Citronensäure, Citronensaure, Zitronensäure, Zitrat, Citrate, Citrat
el: E330, Κιτρικο οξυ
eo: E330, Citra acido
es: E330, Ácido cítrico, acido citrico e330
et: E330, Sidrunhape
eu: E330, azido zitriko
fa: E330, سیتریک اسید
fi: E330, Sitruunahappo, Sitruunahappoa
fr: E330, Acide citrique, Citric acid, Citrate
ga: E330, Aigéad citreach
gl: E330, Ácido cítrico
he: E330, חומצה ציטרית
hi: E330, सिट्रिक अम्ल
hr: E330, kiselina limunska kiselina, limunska, limunska kiselina, limunska kiseline, kiselinski dodatak limunska kiselnia, citratna kiselina, citratna kiselina e330, citronska kiselina
hu: E330, Citromsav
hy: E330, Կիտրոնաթթու
id: E330, Asam sitrat
is: E330, Sítrónusýra
it: E330, Acido citrico, Citrato
ja: E330, クエン酸
ka: E330, ლიმონმჟავა
kk: E330, Лимон қышқылы
ko: E330, 시트르산
ky: E330, Лимон кислотасы
lb: E330, Zitrounesaier
lt: E330, Citrinų rūgštis
lv: E330, Citronskābe, Citrāti
mk: E330, лимонска киселина
ml: E330, സിട്രിക് ആസിഡ്
ms: E330, Asid sitrik
mt: E330, Aċidu ċitriku
nb: E330, Sitronsyre
nl: E330, E330, Citroenzuur, C6H8O7, Citraten
nn: E330, sitronsyre
pa: E330, ਸਿਟਰਿਕ ਤੇਜ਼ਾਬ
pl: E330, Kwas cytrynowy, Kwasek cytrynowy, Cytrynian
pt: E330, Ácido cítrico, Ins 330
ro: E330, Acid citric, Sare de lămâie
ru: E330, Лимонная кислота, Бензилоранж, Цитраты, Лимонная кислота моногидрат, Кислота лимонная моногидрат, Кислота лимонная, регулятор кислотности лимонная кислота
sh: E330, Limunska kiselina
sk: E330, Kyselina citrónová
sl: E330, Citronska kislina
sr: E330, limunska kiselina, limunska kiselina E330
sv: E330, Citronsyra, E 330, Acidum citricum
ta: E330, சிட்ரிக் அமிலம்
te: E330, సిట్రిక్ ఆమ్లం
tr: E330, sitrik asit
uk: E330, лимонная кислота, кислота лимонна
ur: E330, سٹرک تیزاب
vi: E330, Axít citric
wa: E330, Seur di citron
zh: E330, 檸檬酸

en: E331, Sodium citrates
xx: E331
bg: E331, натриеви цитрати
ca: E331, Citrats de sodi
cs: E331, Citronany sodné
da: E331, Natriumcitrater
de: E331, Natriumcitrate, Natriumcitraten
es: E331, Citratos de sodio
et: E331, Naatriumtsitraadid
fi: E331, Natriumsitraatit, natriumsitraatti
fr: E331, Citrates de sodium
hr: E331, natrijevi citrati, regulator kiselosti natrijevi citrati
hu: E331, nátrium-citrátok
it: E331, Citrati di sodio
lt: E331, natrio citratas
lv: E331, nātrija citrāts
mt: E331, ċitrat tas-sodju
nb: E331, Natriumsitrater
nl: E331, Natriumcitraten
pl: E331, cytryniany sodu
ru: E331, Натрия гидроцетрат
sv: E331, Natriumcitrater

en: E331(i), Monosodium citrate
xx: E331(i)
bg: E331(i), Мононатриев цитрат
ca: E331(i), Citrat monosòdic, citrat monosodic
cs: E331(i), Citronan monosodný
da: E331(i), Mononatriumcitrat
de: E331(i), Mononatriumcitrat
el: E331(i), Δισοξινο κιτρικο νατριο
es: E331(i), Citrato monosódico, Citrato sódico
et: E331(i), Naatriumdivesiniktsitraat
fi: E331(i), Mononatriumsitraatti, Mononatriumsitraattia
fr: E331(i), Citrate monosodique
hu: E331(i), Mononátrium-citrát
it: E331(i), Citrato monosodico
lt: E331(i), Mononatrio citratas
lv: E331(i), Mononātrija citrāts
mt: E331(i), Ċitrat monosodiku
nl: E331(i), Mononatriumcitraat
pl: E331(i), Cytrynian monosodowy
pt: E331(i), Citrato monossódico
ro: E331(i), Citrat monosodic
sl: E331(i), Mononatrijev citrat
sv: E331(i), Mononatriumcitrat

en: E331(ii), Disodium citrate
xx: E331(ii)
bg: E331(ii), Динатриев цитрат
ca: E331(ii), Citrat disòdic, citrat disodic
cs: E331(ii), Disodium citrate
da: E331(ii), Dinatriumcitrat
de: E331(ii), Dinatriumcitrat
el: E331(ii), Οξινο κιτρικο νατριο
es: E331(ii), Citrato disódico
et: E331(ii), Naatriumvesiniktsitraat
fi: E331(ii), Dinatriumsitraatti, Dinatriumsitraattia
fr: E331(ii), Citrate disodique
hu: E331(ii), Dinátrium-citrát
it: E331(ii), Citrato disodico
lt: E331(ii), Dinatrio citratas
lv: E331(ii), Dinātrija citrāts
mt: E331(ii), Ċitrat disodiku
nl: E331(ii), Dinatriumcitraat
pl: E331(ii), Cytrynian disodowy
pt: E331(ii), Citrato dissódico
ro: E331(ii), Citrat disodic
sk: E331(ii), Citran disodný
sl: E331(ii), Dinatrijev citrat
sv: E331(ii), Dinatriumcitrat

en: E331(iii), Trisodium citrate, tri sodium citrate, tri-sodium citrate
xx: E331(iii)
bg: E331(iii), Тринатриев цитрат
ca: E331(iii), Citrat trisòdic, citrat trisodic
da: E331(iii), Trinatriumcitrat, trinatriumcitrater
de: E331(iii), Trinatriumcitrat
es: E331(iii), Citrato trisódico
fi: E331(iii), Trinatriumsitraatti, Trinatriumsitraattia, Trinatriumsitraatit
fr: E331(iii), Citrate trisodique
hr: E331(iii), trinatrijev citrat
hu: E331(iii), Trinátrium-citrát
it: E331(iii), Citrato trisodico
ja: E331(iii), クエン酸三ナトリウム
nb: E331(iii), Trinatriumsitrat
nl: E331(iii), trinatriumcitraat
pl: E331(iii), Cytrynian trisodowy
pt: E331(iii), Citrato trissódico
ru: E331(iii), цитрат натрия 3-замещенный, цитрат натрия 3 замещенный
sv: E331(iii), Trinatriumcitrat, Trinatriumcitrater

en: E332, Potassium citrates
xx: E332
bg: E332, Потасиеви цитрати
ca: E332, Citrats de potassi
cs: E332, Citronany draselné
da: E332, Kaliumcitrat
de: E332, Kaliumcitrate, Kaliumcitraten
el: E332, Κιτρικά κάλια
es: E332, Citratos de potasio
et: E332, Kaaliumtsitraadid
fi: E332, Kaliumsitraatit
fr: E332, Citrates de potassium
hr: E332, Kalijev citrat
hu: E332, Kálium-citrátok
it: E332, Citrati di potassio
lt: E332, Kalio citratai
lv: E332, Kālija citrāti
mt: E332, Ċitratu tal-potassju
nl: E332, Kaliumcitraten
pl: E332, Cytryniany potasu
pt: E332, Citratos de potássio
ro: E332, Citrați de potasiu
ru: E332, Калиевые цитраты
sk: E332, Citrány draselné
sl: E332, Kalijevi citrati
sv: E332, Kaliumcitrater

en: E332(i), Monopotassium citrate
xx: E332(i)
bg: E332(i), Монокалиев цитрат
cs: E332(i), Citronan monodraselný
da: E332(i), Monokaliumcitrat
de: E332(i), Monokaliumcitrat
el: E332(i), Δισοξινο κιτρικο καλιο
es: E332(i), Citrato monopotásico
et: E332(i), Kaaliumdivesiniktsitraat
fi: E332(i), Monokaliumsitraatti, Monokaliumsitraattia
fr: E332(i), Citrate monopotassique
hu: E332(i), Monokálium-citrát
it: E332(i), Citrato monopotassico
lt: E332(i), Monokalio citratas
lv: E332(i), Monokālija citrāts
mt: E332(i), Ċitrat monopotassiku
nl: E332(i), Monokaliumcitraat
pl: E332(i), Cytrynian monopotasowy
pt: E332(i), Citrato monopotássico
ro: E332(i), Citrat monopotasic
sl: E332(i), Monokalijev citrat
sv: E332(i), Monokaliumcitrat

en: E332(ii), Tripotassium citrate, tri-potassium citrate, tri potassium citrate, potassium citrate
xx: E332(ii)
bg: E332(ii), Трикалиев цитрат, Калиев цитрат
bs: E332(ii), Kalij citrat
cs: E332(ii), Tripotassium citrate, citronan draselný
cy: E332(ii), Potasiwm sitrad
da: E332(ii), Trikaliumcitrat
de: E332(ii), Trikaliumcitrat, Kaliumcitrat
el: E332(ii), κιτρικό κάλιο
eo: E332(ii), E332(ii), Kalia citrato tribaza
es: E332(ii), Citrato tripotásico, citrato de potasio
et: E332(ii), kaaliumtsitraat
fa: E332(ii), پتاسیم سیترات
fi: E332(ii), Trikaliumsitraatti, Trikaliumsitraattia, kaliumsitraatti
fr: E332(ii), Citrate tripotassique, citratex de potassium
hu: E332(ii), Trikálium-citrát, kálium-citrát
it: E332(ii), Citrato tripotassico, citrato di potassio
ja: E332(ii), クエン酸カリウム, クエン酸K, クエン酸Ｋ
lt: E332(ii), Trikalio citratas, kalio citratas
lv: E332(ii), Trikālija citrāts, kālija citrāts
mt: E332(ii), Ċitrat tripotassiku, ċitrat tal-potassju
nb: E332(ii), Kaliumsitrat
nl: E332(ii), Trikaliumcitraat, kaliumcitraat, kaliumzouten van citroenzuur
pl: E332(ii), Cytrynian tripotasowy, cytrynian potasu, cytrynian tripotasu
pt: E332(ii), Citrato tripotássico, citrato de potássio
ro: E332(ii), Citrat tripotasic, citrat de potasiu
ru: E332(ii), цитрат калия
sk: E332(ii), Citran tridraselný, citran draselný
sl: E332(ii), Trikalijev citrat, kalijev citrat
sr: E332(ii), Kalijum citrat
sv: E332(ii), Trikaliumcitrat, kaliumcitrat
ta: E332(ii), பொட்டாசியம் சிட்ரேட்டு
te: E332(ii), పొటాషియం సిట్రేట్
vi: E332(ii), Kali xitrat
zh: E332(ii), 檸檬酸鉀

en: E333, Calcium citrates, Calcium citrate, Calcium salts of citric acid
xx: E333
bg: E333, Калциев цитрат
ca: E333, Citrats de calci
cs: E333, Citronany vápenaté
de: E333, Calciumcitrat, Kalziumzitrat, Calciumcitrate, Calciumsalze der Zitronensäure
el: E333, Κιτρικο ασβεστιο
es: E333, Citratos de calcio, citrato cálcico, citrato de calcio, Sal amarga, sales cálcicas de ácido cítrico
et: E333, Kaltsiumtsitraadid
fi: E333, Kalsiumsitraatit, Kalsiumsitraatti, Kalsiumsitraattia
fr: E333, Citrates de calcium, Citrate de calcium
hr: E333, kalcijevi citrati
hu: E333, Kalcium-citrátok, Kalcium-citrát
it: E333, Citrato di calcio, calcio citrato
nl: E333, Calciumcitraten
pl: E333, Cytryniany wapnia, cytrynian wapnia
pt: E333, Citrato de cálcio
ru: E333, Цитрат кальция
sk: E333, Citrát trivápenatý
sv: E333, Kalciumcitrater

en: E333(i), Monocalcium citrate
xx: E333(i)
bg: E333(i), Монокалциев цитрат
cs: E333(i), Monocalcium citrate
da: E333(i), Monocalciumcitrat
de: E333(i), Monocalciumcitrat
el: E333(i), Δισοξινο κιτρικο ασβεστιο
es: E333(i), Citrato monocálcico
et: E333(i), Kaltsiumdivesiniktsitraat
fi: E333(i), Monokalsiumsitraatti, Monokalsiumsitraattia
fr: E333(i), Citrate monocalcique, Citrate de monocalcium
hu: E333(i), Monokalcium-citrát
it: E333(i), Citrato monocalcico
lt: E333(i), Monokalcio citratas
lv: E333(i), Monokalcija citrāts
mt: E333(i), Ċitrat monokalċiku
nl: E333(i), Monocalciumcitraat
pl: E333(i), Cytrynian monowapniowy
pt: E333(i), Citrato monocálcico
ro: E333(i), Citrat monocalcic
sk: E333(i), Citran monovápenatý, Kalcium-citrát
sl: E333(i), Monokalcijev citrat
sv: E333(i), Monokalciumcitrat

en: E333(ii), Dicalcium citrate
xx: E333(ii)
bg: E333(ii), Дикалциев цитрат
cs: E333(ii), Dicalcium citrate
da: E333(ii), Dicalciumcitrat
de: E333(ii), Dicalciumcitrat
es: E333(ii), Citrato dicálcico
et: E333(ii), Kaltsiumvesiniktsitraat
fi: E333(ii), Dikalsiumsitraatti, Dikalsiumsitraattia
fr: E333(ii), Citrate dicalcique, Citrate de dicalcium
hu: E333(ii), Dikalcium-citrát
it: E333(ii), Citrato dicalcico
lt: E333(ii), Dikalcio citratas
lv: E333(ii), Dikalcija citrāts
mt: E333(ii), Ċitrat dikalċiku
nl: E333(ii), Dicalciumcitraat
pl: E333(ii), Cytrynian diwapniowy
pt: E333(ii), Citrato dicálcico
ro: E333(ii), Citrat dicalcic
sk: E333(ii), Citran divápenatý, dicitran divápenatý
sl: E333(ii), Dikalcijev citrat
sv: E333(ii), Dikalciumcitrat

en: E333(iii), Tricalcium citrate, tri-calciumcitrate
xx: E333(iii)
bg: E333(iii), Трикалциев цитрат
cs: E333(iii), Tricalcium citrate
da: E333(iii), Tricalciumcitrat
de: E333(iii), Tricalciumcitrat
es: E333(iii), Citrato tricálcico
et: E333(iii), Kaltsiumtsitraat
fa: E333(iii), کلسیم سیترات
fi: E333(iii), Trikalsiumsitraatti, Trikalsiumsitraattia
fr: E333(iii), Citrate tricalcique, Citrate de tricalcium
hr: E333(iii), trikalcijcitrat, trikalcijev-citrat
hu: E333(iii), Trikalcium-citrát
it: E333(iii), Citrato tricalcico
lt: E333(iii), Trikalcio citratas
lv: E333(iii), Trikalcija citrāts
mt: E333(iii), Ċitrat trikalċiku
nb: E333(iii), Trikalsiumsitrat
nl: E333(iii), Tricalciumcitraat
pl: E333(iii), Cytrynian triwapniowy
pt: E333(iii), Citrato tricálcico
ro: E333(iii), Citrat tricalcic
sk: E333(iii), Citran trivápenatý, dicitran trivápenatý
sl: E333(iii), Trikalcijev citrat
sv: E333(iii), Trikalciumcitrat
zh: E333(iii), 柠檬酸钙

en: E334, L(+)-tartaric acid, tartaric acid, 2\,3-dihydroxybutanedioic acid, 2\,3-dihydroxysuccinic acid, threaric acid, racemic acid, uvic acid, paratartaric acid
xx: E334
ar: E334, حمض الطرطريك
bg: E334, L(+)-винена киселина, винена киселина, Лимонтузу, Лимонтозу
bn: E334, টারটারিক অ্যাসিড
bs: E334, Vinska kiselina
ca: E334, àcid L(+)-tartàric, Àcid tartàric, acid tartaric, àcid tartàric, tàrtic, tartàric
cs: E334, L(+)-kyselina vinná, Kyselina vinná, E 334, Kyselina hroznová
cy: E334, Asid tartarig
da: E334, L(+)-tartaric acid, tartaric acid, L-Vinsyre, L-2\,3-dihydroxybutandisyre, Vinsyre, tartaric acid
de: E334, L(+)-Weinsäure, Weinsäure (L+), L-Weinsäure, L-2\,3-Dihydroxybutandisäure, Weinsäure, Threarsäure, Tartaric acid, 2\,3-Dihydroxybutandisäure, 2\,3-Dihydroxybernsteinsäure, Dihydroxybernsteinsäure, D-(-)-Weinsäure, Traubensäure, Weinsteinsäure, Weinsäure
el: E334, L(+)-τρυγικο οξυ, τρυγικο οξυ
eo: E334, Tartrata acido
es: E334, Ácido tartárico, Ácido l(+)-tartárico, Crémor tartaro, Ácido tártrico, Acido tartrico, tártico, tartárico
et: E334, L(+)-viinhape, viinhape, L-viinhape, L-2\,3-dihüdroksübutaandihape
eu: E334, Azido tartariko
fa: E334, اسید تارتاریک
fi: E334, L(+)-viinihappo, viinihappo, L-Viinihappo, L-2\,3-Dihydroksibutaanidihappo, 2\,3-dihydroksibutaanidihappo, L(+)-viinihappoa, viinihappoa, L-Viinihappoa, L-2\,3-Dihydroksibutaanidihappo, 2\,3-dihydroksibutaanidihappoa, viinhape
fr: E334, Acide L-tartrique, Acide tartrique, Acide L(+)tartrique, Acide d-α, β-dihydroxysuccinique, Acide dextrotartarique, acide 3-hydroxy malique, Acide DL-tartrique, Acide DL-tartrique monohydraté, Acide racémique, Acide D-tartrique, Tartrate, Acide mesotartrique
ga: E334, Aigéad tartarach
gl: E334, Ácido tartárico
he: E334, חומצה טרטרית
hi: E334, टार्टरिक अम्ल
hr: E334, vinska, vinska kiselina
hu: E334, L(+)-borkősav, L-(+)-borkősav, borkősav, L-Borkősav, L-tartarát L-2\,3-Dihidroxi-butándisav
hy: E334, Գինեթթու
id: E334, Asam tartarat
it: E334, L(+)-acido tartarico, acido tartarico, Acido 2\,3-diidrossibutandioico, Tartaro emetico, Tartrato
ja: E334, 酒石酸
ko: E334, 타타르산
lt: E334, Vyno rūgštis (l(+)-), vyno rūgštis
lv: E334, L(+)-vīnskābe, vīnskābe, L-vīnskābe, L-2\,3-dihidroksibutāndiskābe, Tartrāti, Mezovīnskābe, Vīnogskābe
mk: E334, Винска киселина
ml: E334, ടാർട്ടാറിക് അമ്ലം
mt: E334, L(+)-aċidu tartariku, aċidu tartariku
my: E334, တာတာရစ် အက်ဆစ်
nl: E334, L(+)-wijnsteenzuur, wijnsteenzuur, L-Wijnsteenzuur, L-2\,3-dihydroxybutaandizuur, Wijnsteenzuur, Druivenzuur
pl: E334, Kwas winowy l(+), kwas winowy, Kwas winny, Winiany
pt: E334, Ácido l(+)-tartárico, ácido tartárico, Tartarato
ro: E334, Acid l(+)- tartric, acid tartric, Acid L-tartric, Acid L-2\,3-dihidroxibutandioic
sh: E334, Vinska kiselina
sk: E334, Kyselina l-(+)-vínna, kyselina vínna
sl: E334, Vinska kislina (l (+) -), vinska kislina
sr: E334, винска киселина
sv: E334, L(+)-vinsyra, L-vinsyra, L-2\,3-dihydroxibutandisyra, Vinsyra, Tartrat
te: E334, టార్టారిక్ ఆమ్లం
tr: E334, Tartarik asit
uk: E334, Винна кислота
uz: E334, Vino kislota
zh: E334, 酒石酸

en: E335, Sodium tartrates
xx: E335
bg: E335, Натриеви тартарати
ca: E335, Tartrats de sodi
cs: E335, Vinany sodné, Sodné soli kyseliny vinné
da: E335, Natriumtartrater
de: E335, Natriumtartrate
el: E335, Ταρτρικά αλάτα νατρίου
es: E335, Tartratos de sodio
et: E335, Naatriumtartraadid
fi: E335, Natriumtartraatti, Natriumtartraattia, Natriumtartraatit
fr: E335, Tartrates de sodium
hu: E335, Nátrium-tartarátok
it: E335, Tartrati di sodio
lt: E335, Natrio tartratai
lv: E335, Nātrija tartrāti
mt: E335, Tartrati tas-sodju
nl: E335, Natriumtartraat, Natriumtartraten
pl: E335, Winiany sodu, winian sodu, winian sodowy
pt: E335, Tartratos de sódio
ro: E335, Tartrati de sodiu
sk: E335, Sodné soli kyseliny vínovej
sl: E335, Natrijevi tartrati
sv: E335, Natriumtartrater

en: E335(i), Monosodium tartrate
xx: E335(i)
bg: E335(i), Мононатриев тартарат
cs: E335(i), Vinan monosodný
da: E335(i), Mononatriumtartrat
de: E335(i), Mononatriumtartrat
el: E335(i), Οξινο τρυγικο νατριο
es: E335(i), Tartrato monosódico
et: E335(i), Naatriumvesiniktartraat
fi: E335(i), Mononatriumtartraatti, Mononatriumtartraattia
fr: E335(i), Tartrate monosodique
hu: E335(i), Mononátrium-tartarát
it: E335(i), Tartrato monosodico
lt: E335(i), Mononatrio tartratas
lv: E335(i), Mononātrija tartrāts
mt: E335(i), Tartrat monosodiku
nl: E335(i), Mononatriumtartraat
pl: E335(i), Winian monosodowy
pt: E335(i), Tartarato monossódico
ro: E335(i), Tartrat monosodic
sk: E335(i), Vínan sodný
sl: E335(i), Mononatrijev tartrat
sv: E335(i), Mononatriumtartrat

en: E335(ii), Disodium tartrate
xx: E335(ii)
bg: E335(ii), Динатриев тартарат
cs: E335(ii), Vinan disodný
da: E335(ii), Dinatriumtartrat
de: E335(ii), Dinatriumtartrat
el: E335(ii), Τρυγικο νατριο
es: E335(ii), Tartrato disódico
et: E335(ii), Naatriumtartraat
fi: E335(ii), Dinatriumtartraatti, Dinatriumtartraattia
fr: E335(ii), Tartrate disodique
hu: E335(ii), Dinátrium-tartarát
it: E335(ii), Tartrato disodico
lt: E335(ii), Dinatrio tartratas
lv: E335(ii), Dinātrija tartrāts
mt: E335(ii), Tartrat disodiku
nl: E335(ii), Dinatriumtartraat
pl: E335(ii), Winian disodowy
pt: E335(ii), Tartarato dissódico
ro: E335(ii), Tartrat disodic
sk: E335(ii), Vínan disodný
sl: E335(ii), Dinatrijev tartrat
sv: E335(ii), Dinatriumtartrat

en: E336, Potassium tartrates
xx: E336
ca: E336, Tartrat de potassi
cs: E336, Vinany draselné
de: E336, Kaliumtartrate
eo: E336, Kalia tartrato
es: E336, tartratos de potasio
fi: E336, kaliumtartraatit, Kaliumtartraatti, Kaliumtartraattia
fr: E336, Tartrates de potassium, Tartrate de potassium, argol
hu: E336, Kálium-tartarát
it: E336, tartrati di potassio, Tartrato di potassio
nl: E336, Kaliumtartraten
pl: E336, Winiany potasu
pt: E336, Tartarato de potássio
ru: E336, тартрат калия
sh: E336, Kalijum tartrat
sr: E336, Kalijum tartrat
sv: E336, Kaliumtartrater